Massachusetts, session 194th, H2515.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 70F of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the fifth paragraph the following
paragraph:-
It shall not be a violation of this section for any facility, physician or health care provider
to test any person for the presence of the HIV antibody or antigen in compliance with a court
order issued pursuant to section 70I.
SECTION 2. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 70H the following section:-
70I. Any law enforcement officer as defined in section 116C of chapter 6 of the General
Laws, healthcare provider, firefighter, EMS personnel, or paramedic who, in the course of his or
of 2

her official duties, has been exposed to the transfer of blood, semen, or other bodily fluid of
another person may petition a justice of the superior court for an order compelling the testing of
that other person for the HIV antibody or antigen. The results of that test shall only be shared
with the exposed law enforcement officer, healthcare provider, firefighter, EMS personnel, or
paramedic and his or her medical care provider.
of 2